pl: Typ złącza elektrycznego sterowania ogrzewaniem: Złącza konektorowe/wsuwki; Złącza cylindryczne; Złącze modułu CAN/LIN; Fabryczna wielostykowa wtyczka OEM; Złącze taśmy elastycznej (FPC/FFC); Wtyczka typu ISO; Luźne przewody (odizolowane); Luźne przewody (zakończone złączem); Złącze taśmy kablowej; Końcówki oczkowe; Zaciski śrubowe; Przyłącza podciśnienia (z elektrycznymi); Inny
hu: Fűtésvezérlés elektromos csatlakozó típusa: Késes/villás csatlakozók; Hengeres (bullet) csatlakozók; CAN/LIN modulcsatlakozó; Gyári (OEM) többtűs kábelköteg-csatlakozódugó; Laposkábel- (FPC/FFC) csatlakozó; ISO rádiós csatlakozódugó; Vezetékes (csupasz huzal); Vezetékes (csatlakozóval); Szalagkábel-csatlakozó; Gyűrűs saruk; Csavaros csatlakozók; Vákuumvezeték-portok (elektromossal); Egyéb
ro-RO: Tip conector electric pentru controlul încălzitorului: Terminale tip papuc/lamelă; Terminale tip glonț; Conector modul CAN/LIN; Mufă de cablu OEM din fabrică cu mai mulți pini; Conector de cablu flexibil (FPC/FFC); Mufă stil radio ISO; Fire tip pigtail (fir neizolat); Fire tip pigtail (sertizate); Conector cu cablu panglică; Terminale inelare; Terminale cu șurub; Porturi pentru conducte de vacuum (cu conexiune electrică); Altele
hr-HR: Električni mehanizam upravljanja grijačem tipa sinkronizacije: Plosnati/viličasti priključci; Okrugli priključci; Konektor CAN/LIN modula; Tvornički OEM višepinski utikač kabelskog svežnja; Konektor fleksibilnog kabela (FPC/FFC); ISO utikač (u stilu radija); Pigtail žice (gola žica); Pigtail žice (s priključkom); Konektor trakastog kabela; Prstenasti priključci; Vijčani priključci; Priključci za vakuumski vod (s elektrikom); Ostalo
it: Tipo di connettore elettrico per il controllo del riscaldatore: Terminali a lama/faston; Terminali a proiettile; Connettore modulo CAN/LIN; Spina a più pin OEM di fabbrica; Connettore per cavo flessibile (FPC/FFC); Spina tipo radio ISO; Cavi pigtail (filo nudo); Cavi pigtail (terminati); Connettore per cavo a nastro; Terminali ad anello; Morsetti a vite; Porte della linea del vuoto (con impianto elettrico); Altro
es: Tipo de conector eléctrico para el control del calentador: Terminales de pala/espada; Terminales cilíndricos; Conector del módulo CAN/LIN; Enchufe de arnés multipin OEM de fábrica; Conector de cable flexible (FPC/FFC); Enchufe de radio estilo ISO; Cables flexibles (cable pelado); Cables flexibles (terminados); Conector de cable plano; Terminales de anillo; Terminales de tornillo; Puertos de línea de vacío (con sistema eléctrico); Otro
en: Heater control electrical connector type: Blade/spade terminals; Bullet terminals; CAN/LIN module connector; Factory OEM multi-pin harness plug; Flex cable (FPC/FFC) connector; ISO radio-style plug; Pigtail leads (bare wire); Pigtail leads (terminated); Ribbon cable connector; Ring terminals; Screw terminals; Vacuum line ports (with electrical); Other
sl-SI: Vrsta električnega priključka upravljanja grelnika: Ploščati/viličasti priključki; Okrogli natični priključki; Konektor modula CAN/LIN; Tovarniški večpolni vtič OEM; Konektor za fleksibilni kabel (FPC/FFC); ISO vtič v slogu radia; Pigtail kabli (gola žica); Pigtail kabli (s priključki); Konektor za tračni kabel; Obročasti priključki; Vijačne sponke; Vakuumska vrata (z elektriko); Drugo
el: Τύπος ηλεκτρικής σύνδεσης χειριστηρίου θερμαντήρα.: Ακροδέκτες τύπου φις/διχάλας; Ακροδέκτες τύπου σφαίρας; Βύσμα μονάδας CAN/LIN; Εργοστασιακό πολυπολικό βύσμα πλεξούδας OEM; Βύσμα εύκαμπτου καλωδίου (FPC/FFC); Βύσμα ραδιοφώνου τύπου ISO; Ακροδέκτες Pigtail (γυμνό καλώδιο); Ακροδέκτες Pigtail (τερματισμένοι); Βύσμα καλωδιοταινίας; Δακτυλιοειδείς ακροδέκτες; Βιδωτοί ακροδέκτες; Θύρες γραμμής υποπίεσης (με ηλεκτρικά); Άλλος
vi: Loại đầu nối điện của bộ điều khiển sưởi: Đầu cos ghim/chĩa; Đầu cos tròn; Đầu nối mô-đun CAN/LIN; Giắc cắm nhiều chốt OEM nguyên bản; Đầu nối cáp dẻo (FPC/FFC); Giắc cắm kiểu radio ISO; Dây nối dài (dây trần); Dây nối dài (có đầu cos); Đầu nối cáp bẹ; Đầu cos khuyên; Đầu cos bắt vít; Cổng đường ống chân không (có kết nối điện); Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de conector elétrico para controle do aquecedor: Terminais tipo faca/pá; Terminais tipo bala; Conector de módulo CAN/LIN; Plugue de chicote multipinos original de fábrica (OEM); Conector de cabo flexível (FPC/FFC); Plugue estilo rádio ISO; Cabos pigtail (fio desencapado); Cabos pigtail (com terminal); Conector de cabo flat; Terminais tipo anel; Terminais tipo parafuso; Portas de linha de vácuo (com elétrico); Outro
fr: Type de connecteur électrique de la commande de chauffage: Cosses plates/à fourche; Cosses rondes; Connecteur de module CAN/LIN; Fiche de faisceau multibroches OEM d’usine; Connecteur de câble flexible (FPC/FFC); Fiche de type radio ISO; Fils de raccordement (fil dénudé); Fils de raccordement (avec cosses); Connecteur de câble ruban; Cosses à anneau; Bornes à vis; Orifices de ligne de vide (avec électrique); Autre
ru: Тип электрического разъема блока управления отопителем: Ножевые клеммы; Штекерные клеммы; Разъем модуля CAN/LIN; Многоконтактный штекер заводской OEM-проводки; Разъем гибкого кабеля (FPC/FFC); Штекер в стиле ISO-магнитолы; Выводы (оголенный провод); Выводы (обжатые); Разъем плоского кабеля; Кольцевые клеммы; Винтовые клеммы; Порты вакуумной линии (с электрикой); Другое
ja: ヒーター制御電気コネクタータイプ: ブレード/スペード端子; バレット端子; CAN/LINモジュールコネクター; 純正OEMマルチピンハーネスプラグ; フレックスケーブル (FPC/FFC) コネクター; ISOラジオスタイルプラグ; ピグテールリード (裸線); ピグテールリード (終端処理済み); リボンケーブルコネクター; リング端子; ネジ式端子; 真空ラインポート (電気端子付き); その他
zh-CN: 加热器控制电气接头类型: 刀片/铲形端子; 子弹形端子; CAN/LIN 模块连接器; 出厂 OEM 多针线束插头; 柔性线缆 (FPC/FFC) 连接器; ISO 收音机样式插头; 引出线（裸线）; 引出线（带端子）; 排线连接器; 环形端子; 螺钉端子; 真空管接口（带电气）; 其他
de: Typ des elektrischen Steckverbinders der Heizungssteuerung: Flachsteckhülsen; Rundsteckverbinder; CAN-/LIN-Modul-Steckverbinder; OEM-Mehrfachstecker (ab Werk); Flachbandkabel-Steckverbinder (FPC/FFC); ISO-Radio-Stecker; Pigtail-Kabel (blanker Draht); Pigtail-Kabel (konfektioniert); Flachbandkabel-Steckverbinder; Ringkabelschuhe; Schraubklemmen; Vakuumleitungsanschlüsse (mit Elektrik); Sonstige
da: Type af elektrisk stik til varme-/HVAC-styring: Blad-/spadeterminaler; Rundstikterminaler; Stik til CAN/LIN-modul; OEM-multistiftstik fra fabrik; Stik til flexkabel (FPC/FFC); Stik i ISO-radiostil; Pigtail-ledninger (bar ledning); Pigtail-ledninger (termineret); Stik til båndkabel; Ringterminaler; Skrueterminaler; Vakuumledningsporte (med el); Andet
fi: Lämmittimen ohjauksen sähköliitäntä: Lattaliittimet; Pyöröliittimet; CAN/LIN-moduulin liitin; Tehtaan OEM-moninapainen johtosarjan pistoke; Flex-kaapelin (FPC/FFC) liitin; ISO-radiotyylin pistoke; Pigtail-johtimet (paljas lanka); Pigtail-johtimet (päätetyt); Lattakaapelin liitin; Rengasliittimet; Ruuviliittimet; Alipainelinjojen portit (sähköiset); Muu
ko: 히터 제어용 전기 커넥터 유형: 블레이드/스페이드 단자; 총알 단자; CAN/LIN 모듈 커넥터; 출고용 OEM 멀티핀 하네스 플러그; 플렉스 케이블(FPC/FFC) 커넥터; ISO 라디오 스타일 플러그; 피그테일 리드(나선); 피그테일 리드(단자 연결됨); 리본 케이블 커넥터; 링 단자; 나사 단자; 진공 라인 포트(전기형); 기타
zh-TW: 加熱器控制電氣接頭類型: 刀片/扁平端子; 子彈端子; CAN/LIN 模組連接器; 原廠 OEM 多針腳線束插頭; 軟排線 (FPC/FFC) 連接器; ISO 音響樣式插頭; 引線 (裸線); 引線 (帶端子); 排線連接器; 環形端子; 螺絲端子; 真空管連接埠 (附電線); 其他
th: ขั้วต่อไฟฟ้าควบคุมฮีตเตอร์: ขั้วต่อแบบแบน/เสียบ; ขั้วต่อแบบหัวกระสุน; ขั้วต่อโมดูล CAN/LIN; ปลั๊กต่อสายไฟหลายพินแบบ OEM; ขั้วต่อสายแพ (FPC/FFC); ปลั๊กวิทยุแบบ ISO; สายไฟหางเปีย (สายเปลือย); สายไฟหางเปีย (เข้าหัวสาย); ขั้วต่อสายแพแบบริบบิ้น; ขั้วต่อแบบหางปลา; ขั้วต่อแบบขันสกรู; พอร์ตสายสุญญากาศ (มีระบบไฟฟ้า); อื่นๆ
nb: Varmekontroll elektrisk tilkoblingstype: Flatstift- / spadeterminaler; Rundstiftterminaler; CAN-/LIN-modulkontakt; OEM flerpinners fabrikkontakt; Fleksibel kabelkontakt (FPC/FFC); ISO-radioplugg; Pigtail-ledninger (bare ledninger); Pigtail-ledninger (terminerte); Båndkabelkontakt; Ringterminaler; Skruterminaler; Vakuumporter (med elektrisk); Annet
bg-BG: Тип електрически конектор за управлението на отоплението: Плоски клеми; Цилиндрични клеми; Конектор за CAN/LIN модул; Фабричен OEM многопинов щепсел; Конектор за гъвкав кабел (FPC/FFC); ISO щепсел тип радио; Изводи тип pigtail (гол проводник); Изводи тип pigtail (с накрайници); Конектор за лентов кабел; Кръгли клеми; Винтови клеми; Портове за вакуумна линия (с електрически връзки); Други
nl: Verwarmingsregeling elektrische connector type: Schuif-/spadestekkers; Kogelstekkers; CAN/LIN-moduleconnector; Fabrieks OEM meerpolige kabelboomstekker; Flexkabel (FPC/FFC) connector; ISO radio-achtige stekker; Pigtail-draden (kale draad); Pigtail-draden (afgesloten); Lintkabelconnector; Ringklemmen; Schroefklemmen; Vacuümleidingpoorten (met elektrisch); Overig
tr: Isıtıcı kontrol elektrik konnektörü tipi: Bıçak/çatal terminaller; Mermi terminaller; CAN/LIN modülü konnektörü; Fabrika çıkışlı OEM çok pimli kablo donanımı fişi; Esnek kablo (FPC/FFC) konnektörü; ISO radyo stili fiş; Pigtail uçlar (çıplak tel); Esnek uçlar (sonlandırılmış); Şerit kablo konnektörü; Halka terminaller; Vida terminaller; Vakum hattı bağlantı noktaları (elektrikli); Diğer
sv: Typ av elektrisk anslutning för värmestyrning: Flatstift/spadkontakter; Rundstiftkontakter; CAN/LIN-modulkontakt; OEM-kontakt med flera stift (fabrik); Flexkabelkontakt (FPC/FFC); Kontakt av ISO-radiotyp; Anslutningskablar (ren tråd); Anslutningskablar (terminerade); Bandkabelkontakt; Ringkabelskor; Skruvplintar; Vakuumslangsportar (med el); Övrigt
cs: Typ elektrického konektoru pro ovládání ohřívače: Nožové/vidlicové konektory; Kolíkové konektory; Konektor modulu CAN/LIN; Tovární OEM vícepólová zástrčka kabelového svazku; Konektor flex kabelu (FPC/FFC); Zástrčka typu ISO pro autorádio; Volné vývody (holý drát); Volné vývody (ukončené); Konektor plochého kabelu; Očkové konektory; Šroubové svorky; Podtlakové porty (s elektrikou); Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de conector elétrico para controlo do aquecedor: Terminais tipo lâmina/espada; Terminais tipo bala; Conector de módulo CAN/LIN; Ficha de cablagem multipinos OEM de fábrica; Conector de cabo flexível (FPC/FFC); Ficha estilo rádio ISO; Terminais pigtail (fio nu); Terminais pigtail (com terminal); Conector de cabo plano; Terminais em anel; Terminais de parafuso; Portas de linha de vácuo (com componente elétrica); Outro
sk-SK: Typ elektrického konektora pre ovládanie kúrenia: Nožové kontakty; Kolíkové kontakty; Konektor modulu CAN/LIN; Továrenská viacpinová OEM zástrčka; Konektor pre plochý flex kábel (FPC/FFC); Zástrčka typu ISO (rádio); Krátke vodiče (holý drôt); Krátke vodiče (s koncovkou); Konektor plochého kábla; Očkové kontakty; Skrutkové svorky; Prípojky podtlakového vedenia (s elektrikou); Iné
lt-LT: Šildytuvo valdymo elektros jungties tipas: Plokštieji / šakučių formos gnybtai; Cilindriniai gnybtai; CAN / LIN modulio jungtis; Gamyklinis OEM daugiakontaktis laidų kištukas; Lanksčiojo kabelio (FPC / FFC) jungtis; ISO radijo tipo kištukas; Išvesti laidai (neizoliuoti); Išvesti laidai (su gnybtais); Plokščiojo kabelio jungtis; Žiediniai gnybtai; Sraigtiniai gnybtai; Vakuuminės linijos prievadai (su elektriniais elementais); Kita